Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2005
Accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine, defined.

An accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine means one approved by the board. An accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine shall meet and maintain general minimum standards approved by the board. The minimum standards shall apply equally to all such accredited schools and colleges. Any school or college seeking accreditation shall permit inspections by the department.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the department, with the recommendation of the board, from accepting accreditation of a school or college of osteopathic medicine by the American Osteopathic Association as evidence of meeting the specified requirements of this section or the equivalent thereof.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 118, p. 489;

C.S.1929, § 71-1704;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,140;

Laws 1969, c. 565, § 4, p. 2301;

Laws 1981, LB 451, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 25;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 445;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 106;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,140;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 663.